North Dakota statutes. TITLE 39 Motor Vehicles
CHAPTER 39-01 Definitions and General Provisions

39-01-01.
Definitions. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

In this title, unless the context or subject matter otherwise requires:

“"Appropriate licensed addiction treatment program" means an addiction treatment program conducted by an addiction facility licensed by the department of human services or conducted by a licensed individual specifically trained in addiction treatment

“Authorized emergency vehicles”:

“Class A” authorized emergency vehicles means:

Vehicles of a governmentally owned fire department.

Vehicles when operated by or under the control of a police officer having authority to enforce the provisions of this title or by a salaried employee of a municipal police department within the municipality or by a sheriff or deputy sheriff not including special deputy sheriffs, or by the director of the department of corrections and rehabilitation and the director’s authorized agents who have successfully completed training in the operation of class A authorized emergency vehicles.

Vehicles clearly identifiable as property of the department of corrections and rehabilitation when operated or under the control of the director of the department of corrections and rehabilitation.

Ambulances and other vehicles authorized by licensure granted under chapter 23-27.

Vehicles operated by or under the control of the director, district deputy director, or a district deputy game warden of the game and fish department.

Vehicles owned or leased by the United States and used for law enforcement purposes.

Vehicles designated for the use of the adjutant general or assistant adjutant general in cases of emergency.

Vehicles operated by or under the control of the director of the parks and recreation department.

Vehicles operated by or under the control of a licensed railroad police officer and used for law enforcement purposes.

Vehicles operated by or under the control of the state forester.

Vehicles operated by or under the control of the bureau of criminal investigation and used for law enforcement purposes.

Vehicles operated by or under the state department of health in cases of emergencies.

Vehicles used or operated by governmental search and rescue personnel while performing emergency operations or duties. As used in this paragraph, "search and rescue" means deployment, coordination, and use of available resources and personnel in locating, relieving the distress, and preserving the life of and removing an individual who is missing, trapped, or lost in the back country, remote areas, or waters of the state. The term includes water and dive rescue.

“Class B” authorized emergency vehicles means wreckers and such other emergency vehicles as are authorized by the local authorities.

“Class C” authorized emergency vehicles means:

Vehicles used by the state division of homeland security or local division of emergency management organizations.

Vehicles used by volunteer firefighters while performing their assigned disaster and emergency responsibilities.

Vehicles, other than ambulances, used by emergency medical services personnel.

Vehicles used by volunteer search and rescue personnel if performing an emergency operation or duty upon the request of a state entity, political subdivision, or volunteer fire department. A volunteer organization may classify a personal vehicle as a class C emergency vehicle if needed to assist in a search and rescue operation in accordance with this paragraph. As used in this paragraph, "search and rescue" means deployment, coordination, and use of available resources and personnel in locating, relieving the distress, and preserving the life of and removing an individual who is missing, trapped, or lost in the backcountry, remote areas, or waters of the state. The term includes water and dive rescue.

“Bicycle” means every device propelled solely by human power upon which any person may ride, having two tandem wheels or two parallel wheels and one forward or rearward wheel. The term includes an electric bicycle.

“Bus” means every motor vehicle designed for carrying more than ten passengers and used for the transportation of persons, and every motor vehicle, other than a taxicab, designed and used for the transportation of persons for compensation. Provided, every motor vehicle designed for carrying not more than fifteen persons and used for a ridesharing arrangement, as defined in section 8-02-07, is not a “bus”.

“Business district” means the territory contiguous to a highway when fifty percent or more of the frontage thereon for a distance of three hundred feet [91.44 meters] or more is occupied by buildings in use for business.

“Camping trailer” means a vehicular portable unit mounted on wheels and constructed with collapsible partial side walls that fold for towing by another vehicle and unfold at the campsite to provide temporary living quarters for recreational, camping, or travel use.

“Cancellation” means a license is annulled and terminated because of an error or defect or because the licensee is no longer entitled to the operator’s license, but the cancellation of a license is without prejudice and application for a new license may be made at any time after the cancellation.

“Child restraint system” means a specifically designed device, built-in seating system, or belt-positioning booster that meets the federal motor vehicle safety standards and is permanently affixed to a motor vehicle, is affixed to the vehicle by a safety belt or universal attachment system, or is combined with a federally compliant safety belt system.

“Commercial freighting” means the carriage of things other than passengers, for hire, except that such term does not include:

The carriage of things other than passengers within the limits of the same city;

Carriage by local dray lines of baggage or goods to or from a railroad station from or to places in such city or in the immediate vicinity thereof, in this state, and not to exceed two miles [3.22 kilometers] from the corporate or recognized limits of said city; or

Hauling done by farmers for their neighbors in transporting agricultural products to or from market.

“Commercial passenger transportation” means the carriage of passengers for hire, except that the term does not include:

The carriage of passengers within the limits of a city.

The carriage by local buslines of passengers to or from a railroad station from or to places within any city or within two miles [3.22 kilometers] of the limits of the city.

The carriage of passengers under a ridesharing arrangement, as defined in section 8-02-07.

“Commissioner” means the director of the department of transportation of this state, acting directly or through authorized agents as provided by section 24-02-01.3.

“Controlled-access highway” means every highway, street, or roadway in respect to which owners or occupants of abutting lands and other persons have no legal right of access to or from the same except at such points only and in such manner as may be determined by the public authority having jurisdiction over such highway, street, or roadway.

“Conviction” means a final order or judgment or conviction by the North Dakota supreme court, any lower court having jurisdiction, a tribal court, or a court in another state if an appeal is not pending and the time for filing a notice of appeal has elapsed. Subject to the filing of an appeal, the term includes:

An imposed and suspended sentence;

A deferred imposition of sentence under subsection 4 of section 12.1-32-02; or

A forfeiture of bail or collateral deposited to secure a defendant’s appearance in court and the forfeiture has not been vacated.

“Crosswalk” means that part of a roadway at an intersection included within the connections of the lateral lines of the sidewalks on opposite sides of the highway measured from the curbs, or, in the absence of curbs, from the edges of the traversable roadway; or any portion of a roadway at an intersection or elsewhere distinctly indicated for pedestrian crossing by lines or other markings on the surface.

“Dealer” means every person, partnership, corporation, or limited liability company engaged in the business of buying, selling, or exchanging motor vehicles, or who advertises, or holds out to the public as engaged in the buying, selling, or exchanging of motor vehicles, or who engages in the buying of motor vehicles for resale. Any person, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, or association doing business in several cities or in several locations within a city must be considered a separate dealer in each such location.

“Department” means the department of transportation of this state as provided by section 24-02-01.1.

“Director” means the director of the department of transportation of this state as provided by section 24-02-01.3.

“Driver” means every person who drives or is in actual physical control of a vehicle.

“Electric bicycle” means a bicycle equipped with fully operable pedals, a saddle or seat for the rider, and an electric motor of seven hundred fifty or fewer watts which meets the requirements of one of the following three classes:

A class 1 electric bicycle if the motor provides assistance only when the individual is pedaling and the motor ceases to provide assistance when a speed of twenty miles [32 kilometers] per hour is achieved.

A class 2 electric bicycle if the motor is capable of propelling the bicycle without the individual pedaling and the motor ceases to provide assistance when a speed of twenty miles [32 kilometers] per hour is achieved.

A class 3 electric bicycle if the motor provides assistance only when the individual is pedaling and the motor ceases to provide assistance when a speed of twenty-eight miles [45 kilometers] per hour is achieved.

“Electronic communication device” means an electronic device, including a wireless telephone, personal digital assistant, a portable or mobile computer or other device, and video display equipment. The term does not include a global positioning system or navigation system or a device that is physically or electronically integrated into the motor vehicle.

“Essential parts” means all integral and body parts of a vehicle of a type required to be registered hereunder, the removal, alteration, or substitution of which would tend to conceal the identity of the vehicle or substantially alter its appearance, model, type, or mode of operation and includes all integral parts and body parts, the removal, alteration, or substitution of which will tend to conceal the identity or substantially alter the appearance of the vehicle.

“Explosives” means any chemical compound or mechanical mixture that is commonly used or intended for the purpose of producing an explosion and which contains any oxidizing and combustive units or other ingredients in such proportions, quantities, or packing that an ignition by fire, by friction, by concussion, by percussion, or by detonator of any part of the compound or mixture may cause such a sudden generation of highly heated gases that the resultant gaseous pressures are capable of producing destructive effects on contiguous objects or by destroying life or limb.

“Farm tractor” includes every motor vehicle designed and used primarily as a farm implement for drawing plows, moving machines, and other implements of husbandry.

“Farm trailer” includes those trailers and semitrailers towed by a bona fide resident farmer hauling the farmer’s own agricultural, horticultural, dairy, and other farm products if the gross weight, not including the towing vehicle, does not exceed twenty-four thousand pounds [10886.22 kilograms].

“Fifth-wheel travel trailer” means a vehicular unit mounted on wheels, designed to provide temporary living quarters for recreational, camping, or travel use, of such size or weight as not to require a special highway movement permit and designed to be towed by a motorized vehicle that contains a towing mechanism that is mounted above or forward of the tow vehicle’s rear axle.

“Flammable liquid” means any liquid which has a flash point of seventy degrees Fahrenheit [21.11 degrees Celsius], or less, as determined by a tagliabue or equivalent closed-cup test device.

“Foreign vehicle” means every motor vehicle which is brought into this state other than in the ordinary course of business by or through a manufacturer or dealer and which has not been registered in this state.

“Gross weight” means the weight of a vehicle without load plus the weight of any load thereon.

“Guest” means and includes a person who accepts a ride in any vehicle without giving compensation therefor.

“Highway” means the entire width between the boundary lines of every way publicly maintained when any part thereof is open to the use of the public for purposes of vehicular travel and of every way privately maintained within a mobile home park, trailer park, or campground containing five or more lots for occupancy by mobile homes, travel trailers, or tents when any part thereof is open for purposes of vehicular travel.

“House car” or “motor home” means a motor vehicle which has been reconstructed or manufactured primarily for private use as a temporary or recreational dwelling and having at least four of the following permanently installed systems:

Cooking facilities.

Icebox or mechanical refrigerator.

Potable water supply including plumbing and a sink with faucet either self-contained or with connections for an external source, or both.

Self-contained toilet or a toilet connected to a plumbing system with connection for external water disposal, or both.

Heating or air-conditioning system, or both, separate from the vehicle engine or the vehicle engine electrical system.

A 110-115 volt alternating current electrical system separate from the vehicle engine electrical system either with its own power supply or with a connection for an external source, or both, or a liquefied petroleum system and supply.

“Implement of husbandry” means every vehicle designed and adapted exclusively for agricultural, horticultural, or livestock raising operations or for lifting or carrying an implement of husbandry and in either case not subject to registration if used upon the highway.

“Intersection” means the area embraced within the prolongation or connection of the lateral curb lines, or, if none, then the lateral boundary lines of the roadways of two highways which join one another at, or approximately at, right angles, or the area within which vehicles traveling upon different highways joining at any other angle may come in conflict. Where a highway includes two roadways thirty feet [9.14 meters] or more apart, then every crossing of each roadway of such divided highway by an intersecting highway must be regarded as a separate intersection. In the event such intersecting highway also includes two roadways thirty feet [9.14 meters] or more apart, then every crossing of two roadways of such highways must be regarded as a separate intersection.

“Intoxicating liquor” means and includes any beverage containing alcohol.

“Judgment” means any judgment which has become final by expiration without appeal of the time within which an appeal might have been perfected, or by final affirmation on appeal, rendered by a court of competent jurisdiction of any state of the United States, upon a claim for relief arising out of ownership, maintenance, or use of any motor vehicle, for damages, including damages for care and loss of services, because of bodily injury to or death of any person, or for damages because of injury to or destruction of property, including the loss of use thereof, or upon a claim for relief on an agreement of settlement for such damages.

“Legal owner” means a person who holds the legal title to a vehicle.

“Licensed health care provider” means doctor of medicine, doctor of osteopathy, doctor of chiropractic, optometrist, psychologist, advanced practice registered nurse, or physician assistant who is licensed, certified, or registered in accordance with laws and regulations in this or another state.

“Lienholder” means a person holding a security interest in a vehicle.

“Local authorities” includes every county, municipal, and other local board or body having authority to adopt local police regulations under the constitution and laws of this state.

“Mail” means to deposit mail properly addressed and with postage prepaid with the United States postal service.

“Manifest injustice” means a specific finding by the court that the imposition of sentence is unreasonably harsh or shocking to the conscience of a reasonable person, with due consideration of the totality of circumstances.

“Manufactured home” means a structure, transportable in one or more sections, that, in the traveling mode, is eight body feet [2.44 meters] or more in width or forty body feet [12.19 meters] or more in length, or, when erected onsite, is three hundred twenty square feet [29.73 square meters] or more, and which is built on a permanent chassis and designed to be used as a dwelling with or without a permanent foundation when connected to the required utilities, and includes the plumbing, heating, air-conditioning, and electrical systems contained therein. The term includes any structure that meets all of the requirements of this subsection except the size requirements and with respect to whether the manufacturer voluntarily files a certification required by the United States secretary of housing and urban development and complies with the standards established under title 42 of the United States Code.

“Manufacturer” means any person who manufactures, assembles, or imports and sells new motor vehicles to new motor vehicle dealers for resale in the state; but such term does not include a person who assembles or specially builds interior equipment on a completed vehicle supplied by another manufacturer, distributor, or supplier.

“Metal tires” includes all tires the surface of which in contact with the highway is wholly or partly of metal or other hard, nonresilient material except that this provision does not apply to pneumatic tires.

“Mobile home” means a structure, either single or multisectional, which is built on a permanent chassis, ordinarily designed for human living quarters, either on a temporary or permanent basis, owned or used as a residence or place of business of the owner or occupant, which is either attached to utility services or is twenty-seven feet [8.23 meters] or more in length.

“Modular unit” includes every factory fabricated transportable building unit designed to be incorporated with similar units at a building site into a modular structure to be used for residential, commercial, educational, or industrial purposes.

“Motor vehicle” includes every vehicle that is self-propelled, every vehicle that is propelled by electric power obtained from overhead trolley wires, but not operated upon rails, and, for purposes of motor vehicle registration, title registration, and operator’s licenses, motorized bicycles. The term does not include a snowmobile as defined in section 39-24-01 or an electric bicycle.

“Motorcycle” means every motor vehicle having a seat or saddle for the use of the rider and designed to travel on not more than three wheels in contact with the ground, but excluding implements of husbandry. The term does not include an electric bicycle.

“Motorized bicycle” means a vehicle equipped with two or three wheels, foot pedals to permit muscular propulsion or footrests for use by the operator, a power source providing up to a maximum of two brake horsepower having a maximum piston or rotor displacement of 3.05 cubic inches [49.98 milliliters] if a combustion engine is used, which will propel the vehicle, unassisted, at a speed not to exceed thirty miles [48.28 kilometers] per hour on a level road surface, and a power drive system that functions directly or automatically only, not requiring clutching or shifting by the operator after the drive system is engaged, and the vehicle may not have a width greater than thirty-two inches [81.28 centimeters]. The term does not include an electric bicycle.

“Motor-powered recreational vehicle” means a motorcycle, unconventional vehicle, or off-highway vehicle as defined in section 39-29-01, or a snowmobile as defined in section 39-24-01. The term does not include an electric bicycle.

“Nonresident” means any person who is not a resident of this state.

“Nonresident’s operating privilege” means the privilege conferred upon a nonresident by the laws of this state pertaining to the operation by such person of a motor vehicle, or the use of a vehicle owned by such person, in this state.

“Official traffic-control devices” means all signs, signals, markings, and devices not inconsistent with this title placed or erected by authority of a public body or official having jurisdiction, for the purpose of regulating, warning, or guiding traffic.

“Operator” means every person who drives or is in actual physical control of a motor vehicle upon a highway or who is exercising control over or steering a vehicle being towed by a motor vehicle.

“Operator’s license”, “driver’s license”, or “license to operate a motor vehicle” means any operator’s or driver’s license or any other license or permit to operate a motor vehicle issued under, or granted by, the laws of this state, including:

Any temporary license or instruction permit;

The privilege of any person to drive a motor vehicle whether such person holds a valid license; or

Any nonresident’s operating privilege as defined in this section.

“Owner” means a person, other than a lienholder, having the property in or title to a vehicle. The term includes a person entitled to the use and possession of a vehicle subject to a security interest in another person, but excludes a lessee under a lease not intended as security.

“Park”, when prohibited, means the standing of a vehicle, whether occupied or not, otherwise than temporarily for the purpose of and while actually engaged in loading or unloading.

“Passenger motor vehicle” means every motor vehicle designed principally for the transportation of persons and includes vehicles which utilize a truck chassis, but have a seating capacity for four or more passengers.

“Pedestrian” means any person afoot.

“Person” includes every natural person, firm, copartnership, association, corporation, or limited liability company.

“Pneumatic tires” includes all tires inflated with compressed air.

“Pole trailer” means every vehicle without motive power designed to be drawn by another vehicle and attached to the towing vehicle by means of a reach, or pole, or by being boomed or otherwise secured to the towing vehicle, and ordinarily used for transporting long or irregularly shaped loads such as poles, pipes, or structural members capable, generally, of sustaining themselves as beams between the supporting connections.

“Police officer” means every officer authorized to direct or regulate traffic or to make arrests for violations of traffic regulations.

“Primary source identity document” means documentary evidence of an individual’s name, date of birth, and legal presence required in chapters 39-06 and 39-06.2 related to the issuance of permits, licenses, and nondriver photo identification cards, and retained in the driver record.

“Private road or driveway” means every way or place in private ownership and used for vehicular travel by the owner and those having express or implied permission from the owner, but not by other persons.

“Proof of financial responsibility” means proof of ability to respond in damages for liability, on account of accidents occurring after the effective date of the proof, arising out of the ownership, maintenance, or use of a motor vehicle, in the amount of twenty-five thousand dollars because of bodily injury to or death of one person in any one accident, and, subject to the limit for one person, in the amount of fifty thousand dollars because of bodily injury to or death of two or more persons in any one accident, and in the amount of twenty-five thousand dollars because of injury to or destruction of property of others in any one accident.

“Railroad” means a carrier of persons or property upon cars, other than streetcars, operated upon stationary rails.

“Railroad sign or signal” means any sign, signal, or device erected by authority of a public body or official or by a railroad and intended to give notice of the presence of railroad tracks or the approach of a railroad train.

“Reconstructed vehicle” means any vehicle, of a type required to be registered, materially altered from its original construction by the removal, addition, or substitution of new or used essential parts.

“Recreational vehicle” means any motorcycle not qualified for registration, off-highway vehicle, snowmobile, vessel, or personal watercraft. The term does not include an electric bicycle.

“Residence district” means territory contiguous to a highway not comprising a business district, when the frontage on such highway for a distance of three hundred feet [91.44 meters] or more is occupied mainly by dwellings, or by dwellings and buildings in use for business.

“Revocation” means that the operator’s license is terminated and may not be renewed or restored, except on application for a new license presented to and acted upon by the director after the expiration of the period of revocation.

“Right of way” means the privilege of the immediate use of a roadway.

“Road tractor” means every motor vehicle designed and used for drawing other vehicles and not so constructed as to carry any load thereon either independently or any part of the weight of a vehicle or load so drawn.

“Roadway” means that portion of a highway improved, designed, or ordinarily used for vehicular travel, exclusive of the berm or shoulder. In the event a highway includes two or more separate roadways, the term “roadway” as used herein refers to any such roadway separately but not to all such roadways collectively.

“Saddle mount” means placing the front wheels of the drawn vehicle upon the bed of the drawing vehicle.

“Safety zone” means the area or space officially set aside within a highway for the exclusive use of pedestrians and which is so plainly marked or indicated by proper signs as to be plainly visible at all times while set aside as a safety zone.

“Salvage certificate of title” means a document issued by the department for purposes of proof of ownership of a salvage or destroyed vehicle and not acceptable for motor vehicle registration purposes.

“Schoolbus” means a motor vehicle designed or used to carry more than ten passengers in addition to the driver, and is used for the purpose of transporting preprimary, primary, or secondary school students from home to school, from school to home, or to and from school-related events. For the purposes of chapter 39-21, "schoolbus" means any motor vehicle that is owned or leased by a public or governmental agency and used to transport, preprimary, primary, or secondary school students to or from school or to or from school-related events, or is privately owned and operated for compensation to transport preprimary, primary, or secondary school students to or from school or to or from school-related events. Schoolbus does not include a bus used as a common carrier.

“Semitrailer” includes every vehicle of the trailer type so designed and used in conjunction with a truck or truck tractor that some part of its own weight and that of its own load rests upon or is carried by a truck or truck tractor, except that it does not include a “housetrailer” or “mobile home”.

“Sidewalk” means that portion of a street between the curb lines, or the lateral lines of a roadway, and the adjacent property lines, intended for use of pedestrians.

“Solid tire” includes every tire made of rubber or other resilient material other than a pneumatic tire.

“Special mobile equipment” means every vehicle not designed or used primarily for the transportation of persons or property and only incidentally operated or moved over a highway.

“Specially constructed vehicle” means any vehicle which was not constructed originally under the distinct name, make, model, or type by a generally recognized manufacturer of vehicles.

“Stand” or “standing” means the halting of a vehicle, whether occupied or not, otherwise than temporarily for the purpose of and while actually engaged in receiving or discharging passengers.

“State” means a state, territory, or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, or a province of the Dominion of Canada.

“Stop”, when required, means complete cessation from movement.

“Stop” or “stopping”, when prohibited, means any halting, even momentarily, of a vehicle, whether occupied or not, except when necessary to avoid conflict with other traffic or in compliance with the directions of a police officer or traffic-control sign or signal.

“Street” means the entire width between boundary lines of every way publicly maintained when any part thereof is open to the use of the public for purposes of vehicular travel.

“Superintendent” means the superintendent of the North Dakota state highway patrol, acting directly or through authorized employees of the superintendent.

“Suspension” means that the operator’s license is temporarily withdrawn but only during the period of the suspension.

“Through highway” means every highway or portion thereof on which vehicular traffic is given preferential right of way, and at the entrances to which vehicular traffic from intersecting highways is required by law to yield right of way to vehicles on such through highway and in obedience to either a stop sign or yield sign, when such signs are erected by law.

“Trackless trolley coach” means every motor vehicle which is propelled by electric power obtained from overhead trolley wires but not operated upon rails.

“Traffic” means pedestrians, ridden or herded animals, vehicles, streetcars, and other conveyances either singly or together while using any highway for purposes of travel.

“Traffic-control signal” means any device, whether manually, electrically, or mechanically operated, by which traffic is alternately directed to stop and to proceed.

“Trailer” includes every vehicle without motive power designed to carry property or passengers wholly on its own structure and to be drawn by a motor vehicle, except that it does not include a “housetrailer” or “mobile home”, which terms mean a vehicle as defined in this subsection which is designed and intended for use as living or sleeping quarters for people and which is not used for commercial hauling of passengers.

“Travel trailer” means a vehicular unit mounted on wheels, designed to provide temporary living quarters for recreational, camping, or travel use, and of such size or weight as not to require a special highway movement permit when towed by a motorized vehicle.

“Truck” includes every motor vehicle designed, used, or maintained primarily for transportation of property.

“Truck camper” means a portable unit that is constructed to provide temporary living quarters for recreational, camping, or travel use; consists of a roof, floor, and sides; and is designed to be loaded onto and unloaded from the bed of a pickup truck.

“Truck tractor” includes every motor vehicle designed and used primarily for drawing other vehicles and not so constructed as to carry a load other than a part of the weight of the vehicle and load so drawn.

“Urban district” means the territory contiguous to and including any street which is built up with structures devoted to business, industry, or dwelling houses situated at intervals of less than one hundred feet [30.48 meters] for a distance of a quarter of a mile [402.34 meters] or more.

“Used vehicle” means a motor vehicle which has been sold, bargained, exchanged, given away, or the title to which has been transferred to another, by the person who first acquired it from the manufacturer or importer, dealer, or agent of the manufacturer or importer.

“Vehicle” includes every device in, upon, or by which any person or property may be transported or drawn upon a public highway, except devices moved by human power or used exclusively upon stationary rails or tracks. The term does not include an electric bicycle.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 162, § 1; 1927, ch. 179, § 1; 1927, ch. 180, § 1; 1931, ch. 186, § 1; 1931, ch. 187, § 1; 1933, ch. 160, § 1; 1933, ch. 162, § 1; 1939, ch. 167, §§ 1 to 5; R.C. 1943, § 39-0101; S.L. 1955, ch. 237, §§ 1, 67; 1957 Supp., § 39-0101; S.L. 1959, ch. 286, § 12; 1959, ch. 287, § 2; 1959, ch. 288, § 1; 1963, ch. 253, § 1; 1963, ch. 264, § 2; 1963, ch. 265, §§ 1, 7; 1963, ch. 277, § 1; 1963, ch. 283, § 2; 1963, ch. 405, § 2; 1965, ch. 261, § 1; 1965, ch. 262, § 1; 1965, ch. 263, § 1; 1965, ch. 264, § 1; 1969, ch. 333, § 1; 1969, ch. 343, § 3; 1975, ch. 322, § 1; 1975, ch. 349, § 2; 1977, ch. 326, § 1; 1977, ch. 327, §§ 1, 2; 1977, ch. 328, § 1; 1977, ch. 376, § 1; 1979, ch. 187, § 73; 1979, ch. 401, § 1; 1979, ch. 402, §§ 1, 2; 1979, ch. 403, §§ 1 to 3; 1979, ch. 404, § 1; 1981, ch. 131, § 8; 1981, ch. 378, § 1; 1983, ch. 414, § 1; 1983, ch. 415, § 3; 1983, ch. 416, § 1; 1985, ch. 82, § 98; 1985, ch. 412, § 1; 1985, ch. 413, § 1; 1987, ch. 438, § 1; 1987, ch. 439, § 1; 1989, ch. 72, §§ 13, 25; 1989, ch. 442, § 1; 1991, ch. 640, § 7; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 1993, ch. 80, § 7; 1993, ch. 375, § 1; 1997, ch. 323, § 1; 1997, ch. 324, § 1; 1997, ch. 325, § 1; 1999, ch. 330, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 307, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 322, § 3; 2005, ch. 16, § 25; 2005, ch. 340, § 2; 2005, ch. 344, § 1; 2007, ch. 315, § 1; 2007, ch. 343, § 1; 2011, ch. 271, § 1; 2011, ch. 272, § 1; 2011, ch. 266, § 1; 2013, ch. 281, § 1; 2013, ch. 291, §§ 1, 2; 2013, ch. 307, §§ 1, 2; 2015, ch. 276, § 3, effective April 20, 2015; 2017, ch. 255, § 1, effective August 1, 2017; 2017, ch. 256, § 1, effective August 1, 2017; 2021, ch. 278, § 1, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 279, § 1, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 280, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 3 of chapter 276, S.L. 2015 became effective April 20, 2015, pursuant to an emergency clause in section 12 of chapter 276, S.L. 2015.

Note.

Section 39-01-01 was amended 4 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 1 of Chapter 279, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2329; Section 1 of Chapter 278, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1148; Section 351 of Chapter 352, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1247; and Section 1 of Chapter 280, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2097.

Section 39-01-01 was amended 2 times by the 2017 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 1 of Chapter 256, Session Laws 2017, House Bill 1128; and Section 1 of Chapter 255, Session Laws 2017 House Bill 1105.

Cross-References.

Definition of “conviction”, operators’ licenses, see § 39-06-30.

Definition of suspension, revocation and cancellation, operators’ licenses, see § 39-06-23.

Definitions relating to disposition of traffic offenses, see §§ 39-06.1-01, 39-06.1-08, 39-06.1-09.

Definitions relating to motor vehicle title registration, see § 39-05-01.

General penalty for violation of title, infraction, see § 39-07-06.

Penalty for violation of chapter, misdemeanor, see § 39-01-07.